Utah statutes.
62A-6-114.   Treatment for therapeutic reasons unaffected.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent the medical or surgical treatment, for sound therapeutic reasons, of any person by a physician or surgeon licensed by this state, which treatment may incidentally involve destruction of reproductive functions.

